Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commission" means the Washington medical commission.

(2) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

(3) "Maintenance of certification" means the satisfactory participation in a formal recertification program to maintain board certification after initial certification from the American board of medical specialties or other accrediting organization recognized by the commission.

(4) "Resident physician" means an individual who has graduated from a school of medicine which meets the requirements set forth in RCW 18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter, the term includes individuals designated as intern or medical fellow.

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 2019 c 55 s 3; 2018 c 211 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 302; 1991 c 3 s 158; 1988 c 104 s 1; 1979 c 158 s 51; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 1; 1961 c 284 s 1; 1957 c 60 s 2. Prior: 1947 c 168 s 1, part; 1919 c 134 s 3, part; 1909 c 192 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10008, part; prior: 1905 c 41 s 1, part; 1901 c 42 s 1, part; 1890 p 115 s 3, part; Code 1881 s 2285, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Uniform Anatomical Gift Act: Chapter 68.64 RCW.